Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns S.F. 2355 Section 1. Section 321.177, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 10. To any person whose driverâs license 3 was revoked under section 321.209, subsection 1, paragraph âhâ 4 or âiâ , or section 321.209, subsection 2, who has not complied 5 with section 321.215, subsection 1A. 6 Sec. 2. Section 321.209, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 321.209 Mandatory revocation. 9 1. The department, upon thirty daysâ notice and without 10 preliminary hearing, shall revoke the license or operating 11 privilege of an operator upon receiving a record of the 12 operatorâs conviction for any of the following offenses, when 13 such conviction has become final: 14 1. a. Manslaughter resulting from the operation of a motor 15 vehicle. 16 2. b. A felony if during the commission of the felony a 17 motor vehicle is used. 18 3. c. Failure to stop and render aid as required under the 19 laws of this state or to otherwise comply with section 321.261 20 in the event of a motor vehicle accident resulting in the death 21 or personal injury of another. 22 4. d. Perjury or the making of a false affidavit or 23 statement under oath to the department under this chapter or 24 under any other law relating to the ownership or operation of 25 motor vehicles. 26 5. e. Conviction, or forfeiture of bail not vacated, upon 27 two charges A second or subsequent charge of reckless driving. 28 6. f. Conviction of drag Drag racing. 29 7. g. Eluding or attempting to elude a law enforcement 30 vehicle as provided in section 321.279 . 31 h. Exceeding a speed limit with a detected speed of ten 32 miles per hour or more in excess of the speed limit if the speed 33 limit was forty miles per hour or lower, if not revoked under 34 subsection 2. 35 -1- LSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns 1/ 7 S.F. 2355 i. Exceeding a speed limit with a detected speed of twenty 1 miles per hour or more in excess of the speed limit if the speed 2 limit was higher than forty miles per hour, if not revoked 3 under subsection 2. 4 2. Upon certification, subject to penalty for perjury, by a 5 peace officer who issues a citation for exceeding a speed limit 6 to a person who operated a motor vehicle with a detected speed 7 described in subsection 1, paragraph âhâ or âiâ , the department 8 shall revoke the personâs driverâs license. 9 a. The peace officer who detected the excessive speed 10 may, on behalf of the department, serve immediate notice of 11 intention to revoke and of revocation on the person. If the 12 peace officer serves immediate notice, the peace officer shall 13 take the Iowa driverâs license of the person, if any, and issue 14 a temporary license effective for ten days. The peace officer 15 shall immediately send the personâs license to the department 16 along with the officerâs certificate indicating the personâs 17 detected excessive speed. 18 b. A person whose driverâs license is revoked under this 19 subsection may appeal the revocation in the manner provided to 20 a person suspected of violating section 321J.2 as provided in 21 section 321J.13. 22 c. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 23 to administer this subsection. 24 Sec. 3. Section 321.212, subsection 1, paragraphs b and c, 25 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 26 b. The department shall not revoke a license under the 27 provisions of section 321.209, subsection 5 1, paragraph 28 âeâ , for more than thirty days nor less than five days as 29 recommended by the trial court. 30 c. The department shall revoke a license for six months 31 for a first offense under the provisions of section 321.209, 32 subsection 6 1, paragraph âfâ , where the violation charged did 33 not result in a personal injury or damage to property. 34 Sec. 4. Section 321.215, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 35 -2- LSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns 2/ 7 S.F. 2355 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1 b. However, a temporary restricted license shall not 2 be issued to a person whose license is revoked pursuant to 3 a court order issued under section 321.209, subsections 1 4 through 5 subsection 1, paragraphs âaâ through âdâ ; to a 5 juvenile whose license has been suspended or revoked pursuant 6 to a dispositional order under section 232.52, subsection 7 2 , paragraph âaâ , for a violation of chapter 124 or 453B or 8 section 126.3 ; to a juvenile whose license has been suspended 9 under section 321.213B ; or to a person whose license has been 10 suspended pursuant to a court order under section 714.7D . A 11 temporary restricted license may be issued to a person whose 12 license is revoked under section 321.209, subsection 6 1, 13 paragraph âfâ , only if the person has no previous drag racing 14 convictions. A person holding a temporary restricted license 15 issued by the department under this section shall not operate 16 a motor vehicle for pleasure. 17 Sec. 5. Section 321.215, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 1A. The department shall not issue a 20 temporary restricted license to a person whose driverâs license 21 was revoked under section 321.209, subsection 1, paragraph âhâ 22 or âiâ , or section 321.209, subsection 2, unless the person 23 certifies that the personâs vehicle has an intelligent speed 24 assistance device installed in accordance with section 321.286. 25 A temporary restricted license issued to a person under this 26 subsection is valid for one year. 27 Sec. 6. Section 321.215, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 28 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 29 Upon conviction and the suspension or revocation of a 30 personâs noncommercial driverâs license under section 321.209, 31 subsection 5, 6, or 7 1, paragraph âeâ , âfâ , or âgâ , or section 32 321.210 , 321.210A , or 321.513 ; or upon the denial of issuance 33 of a noncommercial driverâs license under section 321.560 , 34 based solely on offenses enumerated in section 321.555, 35 -3- LSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns 3/ 7 S.F. 2355 subsection 1 , paragraph âcâ , or section 321.555, subsection 1 2 ; or upon suspension or revocation of a juvenileâs driverâs 2 license pursuant to a dispositional order under section 232.52, 3 subsection 2 , paragraph âaâ , for a violation of chapter 124 4 or 453B , or section 126.3 ; or upon suspension of a driverâs 5 license pursuant to a court order under section 714.7D , the 6 person may apply to the department for a temporary restricted 7 license to operate a motor vehicle for the limited purpose or 8 purposes specified in subsection 1 . The application may be 9 granted only if all of the following criteria are satisfied: 10 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 321.286 Intelligent speed assistance 11 device. 12 1. a. A person who is required to have an intelligent speed 13 assistance device installed on a motor vehicle as a condition 14 for operating a motor vehicle under a temporary restricted 15 license issued pursuant to section 321.215, subsection 16 1A, shall not operate a motor vehicle without an approved 17 intelligent speed assistance device installed. 18 b. A person shall not tamper with, circumvent, or remove an 19 intelligent speed assistance device, unless authorized by the 20 department. 21 c. The department shall cancel the temporary restricted 22 license of a person who operates a motor vehicle in violation 23 of paragraph âaâ or âbâ . 24 2. a. The commissioner of public safety shall adopt rules 25 pursuant to chapter 17A to approve certain intelligent speed 26 assistance devices, the means of installation of the devices, 27 and a process for persons deemed to have limited resources to 28 be eligible for a discount on intelligent speed assistance 29 device fees, and shall establish the speed beyond which an 30 intelligent speed assistance device will not allow operation of 31 the motor vehicle in which it is installed. The commissioner 32 may adjust intelligent speed assistance device requirements 33 based on findings and emerging best practices in intelligent 34 speed assistance device technology. 35 -4- LSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns 4/ 7 S.F. 2355 b. The commissioner of public safety shall not approve an 1 intelligent speed assistance device if the device collects 2 unnecessary data not related to the deviceâs proper function, 3 as determined by the commissioner, or if the device vendor does 4 not minimize storage of sensitive or location data or implement 5 sufficient security protections. 6 c. Data related to the use of an intelligent speed 7 assistance device may be shared with the department or a court. 8 Data collected by an intelligent speed assistance device shall 9 not be sold, licensed, or used for commercial purposes. Data 10 related to the use of an intelligent speed assistance device 11 shall not otherwise be shared except under any of the following 12 circumstances: 13 (1) When required by a court order. 14 (2) In accordance with another law. 15 (3) If the data is not personalized and is aggregated for 16 research or evaluation purposes. 17 3. A motor vehicle manufacturer, importer, or dealer is not 18 liable for any loss, injury, or damages caused by the design, 19 manufacture, installation, improper installation, use, or 20 misuse of an intelligent speed assistance device. However, a 21 motor vehicle manufacturer, importer, or dealer is liable for 22 damages if the manufacturer, distributor, or retailer knowingly 23 engages in a repair or update to the intelligent speed 24 assistance device and such repair or update proximately causes 25 loss, injury, or damage. This section does not require a motor 26 vehicle manufacturer, importer, or dealer to manufacture, 27 distribute, or offer for sale a motor vehicle that includes 28 or is compatible with an intelligent speed assistance device. 29 This section does not prohibit a lessor or lienholder from 30 requiring a motor vehicle lessee or owner to notify the lessor 31 or lienholder that an intelligent speed assistance device has 32 been installed on a motor vehicle that is subject to a lease or 33 finance agreement. 34 4. The department shall submit a report to the general 35 -5- LSB 6789XS (2) 91 th/ns 5/ 7 S.F. 2355 assembly on or before the second Monday in January each year 1 and shall publish the report on the departmentâs internet site. 2 The report must summarize intelligent speed assistance device 3 use data and include the number of participants, recidivism 4 rates, and user compliance. 5 5. For purposes of this section, âintelligent speed 6 assistance deviceâ means an aftermarket device that uses 7 location-based technology to automatically regulate vehicle 8 acceleration and speed in accordance with the applicable speed 9 limit for the vehicleâs current location. 10 Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect October 1, 11 2026. 12